North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 12. Disclosure and Contract Requirements for Continuing Care Facilities. [Repealed]

§§ 131E-215 through 131E-224.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989, c. 758, s. 2.

Cross References.

For present provisions pertaining to disclosure and contract requirements for continuing care facilities, see

G.S. 58-64-1

et seq.

§§ 131E-225 through 131E-229.

Reserved for future codification purposes.